Hawaii statutes.
§431M-2 Policy coverage. (a) All individual and group accident and health or
sickness insurance policies issued in this State, individual or group hospital
or medical service plan contracts, and nonprofit mutual benefit society,
fraternal benefit society, and health maintenance
organization health plan contracts shall include within their hospital and
medical coverage the benefits of alcohol use disorder, substance use disorder,
and mental health treatment services, including services for alcohol dependence
and drug dependence, except that this section shall not apply to insurance
policies that are issued solely for single diseases, or otherwise limited,
specialized coverage.

(b) The policies and contracts set forth in
subsection (a) shall not impose any financial requirements or treatment
limitations on mental health or substance use disorder benefits that are more
restrictive than the predominant financial requirements and treatment
limitations, either quantitative or nonquantitative, imposed on medical and
surgical benefits in accordance with the Mental Health Parity and Addiction
Equity Act of 2008. [L 1988, c 202, pt of §1, §3; am L 1994, c 111, §4; am L
1998, c 78, §3; am L 2002, c 239, §1; am L 2003, c 212, §120; am L 2004, c 122,
§82; am L 2014, c 186, §10]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next